Hawaii statutes.
§291C-50 Following too closely. (a)
The driver of a vehicle shall not follow another vehicle more closely than is
reasonable and prudent, having due regard for the speed of such vehicles and
the traffic upon and the condition of the highway.

(b) The driver of a motor truck or motor
vehicle drawing another vehicle when traveling upon a roadway outside of a
business or residence district and which is following another motor truck or
motor vehicle drawing another vehicle shall, whenever conditions permit, leave
sufficient space so that an overtaking vehicle may enter and occupy such space
without danger, except that this shall not prevent a motor truck or motor
vehicle drawing another vehicle from overtaking and passing any like vehicle or
other vehicle.

(c) Motor vehicles being driven upon any
roadway outside of a business or residence district in a caravan or motorcade
whether or not towing other vehicles shall be so operated as to allow
sufficient space between each such vehicle or combination of vehicles so as to
enable any other vehicle to enter and occupy such space without danger. This
provision shall not apply to funeral processions. [L 1971, c 150, pt of §1; am
L 1984, c 273, §5]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next